Utah statutes.
49-20-408.   Prohibition against certain uses of Social Security numbers.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 31A-1-103(3)(f), health, dental,
medical, Medicare supplement, or conversion coverage offered under Section
49-20-202 shall comply with the provisions of Section 31A-22-634.
